Idaho, session 2025, H0427.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Military Division the following amounts
to be expended according to the designated programs and expense classes from
the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I.MILITARYMANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Emergency Medical Services
Fund $250,000 $250,000
II.EMERGENCYMEDICALSERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $71,400 $145,000 $216,400
Emergency Medical Services
Fund 2,338,400 1,156,000 3,494,400
Emergency Medical Services III
Fund $1,700,000 1,700,000
TSE Registry
Fund 130,000 327,000 457,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 813,700 551,400 1,365,100


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 60,000 120,000 0 180,000
TOTAL $3,413,500 $2,299,400 $1,700,000 $7,412,900
GRAND TOTAL $3,663,500 $2,299,400 $1,700,000 $7,662,900
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Military Division is hereby increased by thirty-three and eighty-four
hundredths (33.84) for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Public
Health Services Division is hereby reduced by the following amounts for the
designated program and expense classes from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
EMERGENCYMEDICALSERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $75,100 $85,000 $160,100
Emergency Medical Services
Fund 2,178,100 1,400,200 3,578,300
Emergency Medical Services III
Fund $1,700,000 1,700,000
TSE Registry
Fund 128,300 327,000 455,300
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 817,200 551,400 1,368,600
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,036,600 724,300 4,314,200 6,075,100
TOTAL $4,235,300 $3,087,900 $6,014,200 $13,337,400
SECTION 4. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other authorization
provided by law to the contrary, the full-time equivalent position autho-
rization provided to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Public


Health Services Division is hereby reduced by thirty-two and eight tenths
(32.80) for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare Phys-
ical Health Services Program in the Public Health Services Division the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated expense class
from the Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $959,000
Operating Expenditures 604,300
Trustee and Benefit Payments 4,314,200
TOTAL $5,877,500
SECTION 6. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.